en: Spinning Tops
xx: Spinning Tops
cs: Káči
da: Snurretoppe
de: Kreisel
es: Peonzas
fr: Toupies
it: Trottole
ja: こま
nl: Tollen
no: Snurrebasser
pl: Bączki
pt: Piões
ru: Волчки
sv: Snurror
tr: Fırıldaklar

en: Toy Jacks
xx: Toy Jacks
cs: Skládací šestihrany
da: Terrespil
de: Hampelmänner
es: Matatenas
fr: Pantins
it: Toy jack
ja: ジャックスゲームのコマ
nl: Bikkelen
no: Jacks-leker
pl: Gry w kamienie
pt: Jacques do brinquedo
ru: Игра в бабки
sv: Knucklebones-pjäser
tr: Toy Jack

en: Yo-Yo Parts & Accessories
xx: Yo-Yo Parts & Accessories
cs: Jojo – příslušenství
da: Yoyo – dele og tilbehør
de: Teile und Zubehör für Jo-Jos
es: Piezas y accesorios para yoyós
fr: Pièces et accessoires de yo-yo
it: Accessori e parti di yo-yo
ja: ヨーヨー関連用品
nl: Accessoires en onderdelen voor jojo's
no: Deler og tilbehør til jojoer
pl: Części i akcesoria do jojo
pt: Peças e acessórios para iô-iôs
ru: Запасные части и принадлежности для йо-йо
sv: Jojodelar och tillbehör
tr: Yo-Yo Parça ve Aksesuarları

en: Yo-Yos
xx: Yo-Yos
cs: Joja
da: Yoyoer
de: Jo-Jos
es: Yoyós
fr: Yo-yo
it: Yo-yo
ja: ヨーヨー
nl: Jojo's
no: Jojoer
pl: Jojo
pt: Ioiôs
ru: Йо-йо
sv: Jojoar
tr: Yo-Yolar

en: Art & Drawing Toys
xx: Art & Drawing Toys
cs: Umělecké a kreslicí hračky
da: Kreativitets- og tegnelegetøj
de: Spielzeuge zum Malen & Zeichnen
es: Juguetes de dibujo y artesanía
fr: Jeux de dessin
it: Giocattoli artistici e da disegno
ja: お絵かき
nl: Kleuren en tekenen
no: Kunst- og tegneleker
pl: Zabawki artystyczne i malarskie
pt: Brinquedos de arte e desenho
ru: Игрушки для творчества
sv: Konst- och ritleksaker
tr: Sanat ve Çizim Oyuncakları

en: Play Dough & Putty
xx: Play Dough & Putty
cs: Modelína a chytrá modelína
da: Trylledej og modellervoks
de: Spielteig & Knetmasse
es: Play-Doh y masilla
fr: Pâte à modeler
it: Paste modellabili
ja: 工作用粘土・パテ
nl: Plastic klei
no: Modelleire og kitt
pl: Plastelina i modelina
pt: Massinhas para crianças
ru: Пластилин
sv: Modellera och kitt
tr: Oyun Hamuru ve Macunu

en: Toy Drawing Tablets
xx: Toy Drawing Tablets
cs: Kreslicí tabulky
da: Tegnebræt til børn
de: Zeichentafeln
es: Tabletas de dibujo
fr: Tablettes à dessin
it: Tavolette disegno giocattolo
ja: お絵かきテーブル
nl: Speelgoedtekentabletten
no: Leketegnebrett
pl: Tablice rysunkowe
pt: Prancheta de desenho de brinquedo
ru: Доски для рисования
sv: Leksaksritbräden
tr: Oyuncak Çizim Tabletleri

en: Ball Pit Accessories
xx: Ball Pit Accessories
cs: Míčkové bazény – příslušenství
da: Tilbehør til boldrum
de: Bällebad-Zubehör
es: Accesorios para piscinas de pelotas
fr: Accessoires pour piscines à balles
it: Accessori per piscine di palline
ja: ボールプール関連用品
nl: Accessoires voor ballenbakken
no: Tilbehør til ballbasseng
pl: Akcesoria do basenów kulkowych
pt: Acessórios para piscina de bolinhas
ru: Принадлежности для сухих бассейнов
sv: Bollhavstillbehör
tr: Top Havuzu Aksesuarları

en: Ball Pit Balls
xx: Ball Pit Balls
cs: Míčky do bazénů
da: Bolde til boldrum
de: Bälle für Bällebad
es: Pelotas para piscinas de pelotas
fr: Balles pour piscines à balles
it: Palline per piscine di palline
ja: ボールプール用ボール
nl: Ballen voor ballenbakken
no: Baller til ballbasseng
pl: Kulki do basenów kulkowych
pt: Bolinhas para piscina de bolinhas
ru: Шарики для сухих бассейнов
sv: Bollhavsbollar
tr: Top Havuzu Topları

en: Ball Pits
xx: Ball Pits
cs: Kuličkové bazény
da: Boldrum
de: Bällebäder
es: Piscinas de pelotas
fr: Piscines à balles
it: Piscine di palline
ja: ボールプール
nl: Ballenbakken
no: Ballbinger
pl: Baseny kulkowe
pt: Piscina de bolinhas
ru: Сухие бассейны
sv: Bollhav
tr: Top Havuzları

en: Bath Toys
xx: Bath Toys
cs: Hračky do vany
da: Badelegetøj
de: Bad-Spielzeug
es: Juguetes para baño
fr: Jouets pour le bain
it: Giochi per il bagnetto
ja: お風呂用おもちゃ
nl: Badspeelgoed
no: Badeleker
pl: Zabawki do kąpieli
pt: Brinquedos para banho
ru: Игрушки для купания
sv: Badleksaker
tr: Banyo Oyuncakları

en: Beach & Sand Toys
xx: Beach & Sand Toys
cs: Hračky na pískoviště a na pláž
da: Strandlegetøj
de: Strand- & Sandspielzeug
es: Juguetes para la arena
fr: Jouets de sable et de plage, Jeu de plage, Jeu de sable
it: Giocattoli spiaggia e sabbia
ja: 砂あそび用おもちゃ
nl: Speelgoed voor op het strand en in de zandbak
no: Strand- og sandleker
pl: Zabawki na plażę i do piasku
pt: Brinquedos para praia e areia
ru: Игрушки для пляжа и песочницы
sv: Strand- och sandleksaker
tr: Plaj ve Kum Oyuncakları

en: Building Toys
xx: Building Toys
cs: Stavební hračky
da: Byggelegetøj
de: Bausteine & Bauspielzeug
es: Juguetes de construcción
fr: Jouets de construction
it: Giocattoli per costruzioni
ja: 構成玩具
nl: Bouwspeelgoed
no: Byggeleker
pl: Zabawki do budowania
pt: Brinquedos de montar
ru: Конструкторы и строительные игрушки
sv: Byggleksaker
tr: Yapı Oyuncakları

en: Construction Set Toys
xx: Construction Set Toys
cs: Stavebnice
da: Konstruktionssæt
de: Baukästen
es: Equipos de construcción de juguete
fr: Jeux d'assemblage
it: Costruzioni
ja: 建設現場のおもちゃセット
nl: Bouwsets
no: Byggesettleker
pl: Zestawy do budowania
pt: Brinquedos de conjunto de construção
ru: Игрушечные строительные наборы
sv: Konstruktionsleksaker
tr: Yapı Seti Oyuncakları

en: Foam Blocks
xx: Foam Blocks
cs: Pěnové kostky
da: Skumgummiklodser
de: Schaumstoffbausteine
es: Bloques de espuma
fr: Blocs de mousse
it: Blocchi di gommapiuma
ja: ウレタンブロック
nl: Schuimrubberblokken
no: Skumklosser
pl: Klocki piankowe
pt: Blocos de espuma
ru: Вспененные блоки
sv: Skumgummiklossar
tr: Köpük Bloklar

en: Interlocking Blocks
xx: Interlocking Blocks
cs: Skládací bloky
da: Samleklodser
de: Steckbausteine
es: Bloques de encaje
fr: Blocs à emboîter
it: Blocchi a incastro
ja: 組み立てブロック
nl: Bouwblokken
no: Byggeklosser
pl: Klocki z zaczepami
pt: Blocos de encaixar
ru: Конструкторы из блоков
sv: Sammankopplade klossar
tr: Birbirine Geçen Bloklar

en: Marble Track Sets
xx: Marble Track Sets
cs: Kuličkové skluzavky
da: Kuglebaner
de: Murmelbahnen
es: Circuitos de canicas
fr: Pistes de billes
it: Set piste di biglie
ja: ビー玉ころがし
nl: Knikkerbanen
no: Sett med klinkekulebaner
pl: Tory do kulek
pt: Conjuntos de rampa para bola de gude
ru: Горки с шариками
sv: Kulbaneset
tr: Bilye Yuvarlama Setleri

en: Wooden Blocks
xx: Wooden Blocks
cs: Dřevěné kostky
da: Træklodser
de: Holzbausteine
es: Bloques de madera
fr: Jouets en bois
it: Blocchi di legno
ja: 積み木
nl: Houten blokken
no: Treklosser
pl: Klocki drewniane
pt: Blocos de madeira
ru: Деревянные блоки
sv: Träklossar
tr: Tahta Bloklar

en: Dolls\, Playsets & Toy Figures
xx: Dolls\, Playsets & Toy Figures
cs: Panenky\, hrací sady a figurky
da: Dukker\, legestativer og legetøjsfigurer
de: Puppen\, Spielkombinationen & Spielzeugfiguren
es: Muñecas\, parques infantiles y figuras de juguete
fr: Poupées\, coffrets et figurines
it: Bambole\, playset e giocattoli
ja: 人形・プレイセット
nl: Poppen\, speelsets en speelgoedfiguurtjes
no: Dukker\, lekesett og lekefigurer
pl: Lalki\, zestawy i figurki
pt: Bonecas\, conjuntos e personagens
ru: Куклы\, фигурки и наборы игрушек
sv: Dockor\, lekset och leksaksfigurer
tr: Bebekler\, Oyun Setleri ve Oyuncak Figürler

en: Action & Toy Figures
xx: Action & Toy Figures
cs: Akční a herní postavičky
da: Action- og legetøjsfigurer
de: Action- & Spielzeugfiguren
es: Figuras de acción y de juguete
fr: Figurines jouets, Figurine
it: Action figure
ja: アクションフィギュア・トイフィギュア
nl: Actie- en speelgoedfiguurtjes
no: Action- og lekefigurer
pl: Zabawki i figurki akcji
pt: Bonecos de personagem
ru: Игрушки в виде известных персонажей
sv: Action- och leksaksfigurer
tr: Aksiyon ve Oyuncak Figürleri